Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326
County fund; county treasurer; failure to act; penalty.

If the county treasurer shall willfully fail or refuse at any time to do or perform any act required of him by sections 77-2312 to 77-2324, he shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the county attorney to enter and prosecute to final determination all suits for the recovery of any penalty arising under the conditions of any bond required to be given by the provisions of said sections.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 10, p. 354;

R.S.1913, § 6664;

C.S.1922, § 6195;

C.S.1929, § 77-2512;

R.S.1943, § 77-2326;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 234.